Hawaii statutes.
§576B-319 Receipt and disbursement of
payments. (a) A support enforcement agency or tribunal of this State
shall disburse promptly any amounts received pursuant to a support order, as
directed by the order. The agency or tribunal shall furnish to a requesting
party or tribunal of another state or a foreign country a certified statement
by the custodian of the record of the amounts and dates of all payments
received.

(b) If neither the obligor, nor the obligee
who is an individual, nor the child resides in this State, upon request from
the support enforcement agency of this State or another state, the support enforcement agency of this State or a tribunal
of this State shall:

(1) Direct that the support payment be made to the
support enforcement agency in the state in which the obligee is receiving
services; and

(2) Issue and send to the obligor's employer a
conforming income withholding order or an administrative notice of change of
payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

(c) The support enforcement agency of this
State receiving redirected payments from another state pursuant to a law
similar to subsection (b) shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of
the other state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the
amount and dates of all payments received. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015,
c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next